Maryland, session 2025, HB1033.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – State Personnel and Pensions
22–406.
(c) (1) Except as provided in § 22–407 of this subtitle, the Board of Trustees
shall reduce the allowance of an individual who accepts employment as provided under
subsection (b) of this section if:
(iii) the individual becomes reemployed within 12 months of
receiving an early service retirement allowance under § 22–402 of this subtitle.
(3) A reduction of an early service retirement allowance under paragraph
(1)(iii) of this subsection shall be applied only until the individual has received an allowance
for 12 months.
– 1 –

Ch. 774 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(4) Except for an individual whose allowance is subject to a reduction as
provided under paragraphs (1)(iii) and (3) of this subsection, the reduction of an allowance
under this subsection does not apply to:
(ii) an individual whose average final compensation was less than
[$25,000] THE MINIMUM ANNUAL SALARY ON THE STANDARD STATE PAY SCALE AS
OF JANUARY 1 OF THE PRECEDING CALENDAR YEAR and who is reemployed on a
permanent, temporary, or contractual basis;
23–407.
(b) Except as provided in subsection (d) of this section, an individual who is
receiving a service retirement allowance or a vested allowance may accept employment
with a participating employer on a permanent, temporary, or contractual basis, if:
(1) the individual immediately notifies the Board of Trustees of the
individual’s intention to accept this employment; and
(2) the individual specifies the compensation to be received.
(c) (1) Except as provided in § 23–408 of this subtitle, the Board of Trustees
shall reduce the allowance of an individual who accepts employment as provided under
subsection (b) of this section if:
(iii) the individual becomes reemployed within 12 months of
receiving an early service retirement allowance or an early vested allowance computed
under § 23–402 of this subtitle.
(3) A reduction of an early service retirement allowance or an early vested
allowance under paragraph (1)(iii) of this subsection shall be applied only until the
individual has received an allowance for 12 months.
(4) Except for an individual whose allowance is subject to a reduction as
provided under paragraphs (1)(iii) and (3) of this subsection, the reduction of an allowance
under this subsection does not apply to:
(i) an individual whose average final compensation was less than
[$25,000] THE MINIMUM ANNUAL SALARY ON THE STANDARD STATE PAY SCALE AS
OF JANUARY 1 OF THE PRECEDING CALENDAR YEAR and who is reemployed on a
permanent, temporary, or contractual basis;
25–403.
(b) (3) The reduction under this subsection does not apply to:
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 774
(ii) an individual whose average final compensation was less than
[$25,000] THE MINIMUM ANNUAL SALARY ON THE STANDARD STATE PAY SCALE AS
OF JANUARY 1 OF THE PRECEDING CALENDAR YEAR and who is reemployed on a
permanent, temporary, or contractual basis;
29–115.
(a) (1) This section applies only to a disability retiree who is not eligible to
receive a normal service retirement.
(2) This section does not apply to a disability retiree [who is]:
(i) WHO IS a retiree of:
1. the State Police Retirement System;
2. the Law Enforcement Officers’ Pension System;
3. the Local Fire and Police System; or
4. the Employees’ Retirement System or the Employees’
Pension System, if at the time of retirement the retiree was a law enforcement officer for a
participating employer under § 26–201(a) of this article; [and]
(ii) WHO IS reemployed by a participating employer in any position
other than a probationary status law enforcement officer, a law enforcement officer, as
defined in § 1–101 of the Public Safety Article, or chief; AND
(III) WHOSE AVERAGE FINAL COMPENSATION WAS LESS THAN
THE MINIMUM ANNUAL SALARY ON THE STANDARD STATE PAY SCALE AS OF
JANUARY 1 OF THE PRECEDING CALENDAR YEAR.
29–116.
(a) This section does not apply to a disability retiree:
(1) (i) who is a retiree of:
1. the State Police Retirement System;
2. the Law Enforcement Officers’ Pension System;
3. the Local Fire and Police System; or
– 3 –

Ch. 774 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
4. the Employees’ Retirement System or the Employees’
Pension System, if at the time of retirement the retiree was a law enforcement officer for a
participating employer under § 26–201(a) of this article; and
(ii) who is reemployed by a participating employer in any position
other than a probationary status law enforcement officer, a law enforcement officer, as
defined in § 1–101 of the Public Safety Article, or chief; or
(2) (i) whose average final compensation was less than [$25,000] THE
MINIMUM ANNUAL SALARY ON THE STANDARD STATE PAY SCALE AS OF JANUARY 1
OF THE PRECEDING CALENDAR YEAR; and
(ii) who is reemployed by a participating employer.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 20, 2025.
– 4 –